dev/conjunction/conjuction.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="ও__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="cnjcoo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="এবং"><i>এবং</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="আর"><i>আর</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="কিন্তু"><i>কিন্তু</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="কিংবা"><i>কিংবা</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="অথবা"><i>অথবা</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="তবে"><i>তবে</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="বা"><i>বা</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ও"><i>ও</i><par n="ও__cnjcoo"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
